         
 
Academic Policy 
 
Manual 
 
 
For 
 
 
Students 
                              
 
1  
  
ADMISSION POLICY 
  
 
Qualifications required for Bachelor’s Programme 
 
a) Applicants should have minimum higher 2nddivision in Higher Secondary 
School Certificate or equivalent from a recognized Institute/Board.  
 
b) Applicants having “A” levels or other foreign qualifications must provide an 
equivalence certificate issued by Intermediate Board Committee of 
Chairmen (IBCC).  
 
c) For programs where accrediting bodies have specified any number of seats 
then such conditions must meet.  
 
For admission in B.E. an applicant must have: 
 
i. At least 60% marks in Higher Secondary School Certificate (H.S.C) 
Pre- Engineering Examination. An applicant having a combination of 
Physics, Mathematics and Computer Sciences is also eligible.  
 
ii. Or, GCE (A levels) in Mathematics, Physics and Chemistry. Applicants 
having A levels or other foreign qualifications must provide an 
equivalence certificate with at least 60% marks, issued by 
Intermediate Board Committee of Chairmen (IBCC).  
 
iii. Or, At least 60% marks in Diploma of Associate Engineering 
Examination, for admission against reserved seats in the same 
discipline of Engineering in which he or she has passed the Diploma 
Examination.  
 
iv. Or, first division in B.Sc. (pass) Examination from an HEC recognized 
institution with Mathematics, Physics, and one optional course 
selected from Chemistry or Statistics.   
(The minimum threshold is subject to revision as per Government 
Policy). 
 
d) The number of credit hours needed to be completed and the minimum and 
maximum duration (04 – 07 years) of the program for the award of a degree 
will be according to the policies of the regulatory bodies and the approved 
structure of Academic Council of Iqra University.  
     
 
2  
    
 
Qualifications required for Master’s Programme 
 
a) Applicants (Iqra University Graduates) should have 70% or equivalent 
CGPA, others 3.0 GPA or Equivalent Percentage from recognized 
universities / degree awarding institutions in the eligibility education for a 
minimum duration of 14-years of schooling. In case Institutions mention both 
division and CGPA on the Degree / Transcript must meet either of the two 
conditions.  
 
b) The number of credit hours needed to be completed for the award of a 
degree will be according to the policies of the Higher Education 
Commission. Minimum and maximum duration to complete graduate (MBA 
or any 90 Cr. Hrs. program) in all discipline shall be:  
 
i) 3.5 – 06 years for 90 Cr. Hrs. Stream   
ii) 2.5 – 05 years for 72 Cr. Hrs. Stream   
iii) 2.0 – 4.5 years for 54 Cr. Hrs. Stream   
iv) 1.5 – 04 years for 36/48 Cr. Hrs. Stream  
 
Qualifications required for the M.Phil. Programme 
 
a) Following applicants are eligible for admission in an M.PhilProgramme:  
 
i. Old MBA/MPA/M.com/ICMA/ICA/B.com (4 years).   
ii. BBA 4-year programme with a minimum of 135 credit hours.   
iii. An applicant must have a minimum division or CGPA on a scale of 4 
as prescribed by the HEC for admission to MPhil/MS Program.   
iv. GAT-General or equivalent test with a minimum 50% cumulative 
score will be required.  
 
b) Applicants from recognized universities / degree awarding institution.  
 
c) Institutions which mention both division and CGPA on the Degree / Transcript 
must meet either of the two conditions.  
 
d) Applicants having a foreign degree are required to provide the equivalence 
certificate from Higher Education Commission.  
 
The number of credit hours and minimum and maximum duration (1.5 – 04 
years) needed to be completed for the award of a degree shall be according 
to the policies of the Higher Education Commission and the approved 
structure of the Academic Council of Iqra University. However IU may offer 
additional courses to replenish deficiencies.  
 
3  
  
Qualifications required for the PhD Programme 
 
Following applicants are eligible for admission in a PhD Programme: 
 
For Ph.D. in Business Administration 
 
a) MS/M.Phil in the relevant field of study.  
 
b) MBA with a minimum of 90 Credit hours (with 2 year bachelor’s 
programme) in the relevant field of study.  
 
c) MBA with a minimum of 36 Credit hours (with 4 year bachelor’s 
programme) in the relevant field of study.  
 
d) Minimum CGPA should be 3.0 on a scale of 4.  
 
e) In addition candidates must pass subject GRE (international) test for 
admission in PhD with 60% percentile score or GAT Subject with 
minimum of 60% marks or University administered GAT Subject with 
70% marks.  
 
The number of credit hours needed to be completed for the award of a degree 
as well as minimum and maximum duration to complete Ph.D Programs shall 
be 03 – 08 years, according to the policies of the Higher Education 
Commission and the structure approved by BASR / Academic Council of Iqra 
University. 
 
For Ph.D. in Computer Sciences 
 
a) MS/Mphil in Computer Sciences with a minimum of 36 credit hours out of 
which course work should be of 24 credit hours.  
 
b) BS Computer Science / Telecommunication 4-year programme 
(minimum 137 credit hours)  
 
c) Minimum CGPA should be 3.0 on a scale of 4.  
 
f) In addition candidates must pass subject GRE (international) test for 
admission in PhD with 60% percentile score or GAT Subject with 
minimum of 60% marks or University administered GAT Subject with 
70% marks.  
 
The number of credit hours needed to be completed for the award of a degree 
as well as minimum and maximum duration to complete Ph.D Programs shall 
be 03 – 08 years, according to the policies of the Higher Education 
 
4  
Commission and the structure approved by BASR / Academic Council of Iqra 
University. 
For Ph. D in Telecommunication 
a) MS/MPhil in Telecommunication / Electrical / Electronics / Computer 
Engineering with a minimum of 36 credit hours out of which course work 
should be of 24 credit hours.  
b) BE in Electrical/Electronics/Computer/Telecommunication Engineering 
(minimum 140 Credit Hours).  
c) Minimum CGPA should be 3.0 on a scale of 4.  
g) In addition candidates must pass subject GRE (international) test for 
admission in PhD with 60% percentile score or GAT Subject with 
minimum of 60% marks or University administered GAT Subject with 
70% marks.  
The number of credit hours needed to be completed for the award of a degree 
as well as minimum and maximum duration to complete Ph.D Programs shall 
be 03 – 08 years, according to the policies of the Higher Education 
Commission and the structure approved by BASR / Academic Council of Iqra 
University. 
Other Programmes 
a) Applicants must have a minimum of 18 years of relevant schooling from 
HEC recognized institutions.  
b) The minimum CGPA should be 3.0 (on a scale of 4) in 
MS/MPhil/Equivalent Degree for admission into PhD.  
h) In addition candidates must pass subject GRE (international) test for 
admission in PhD with 60% percentile score or GAT Subject with 
minimum of 60% marks or University administered GAT Subject with 
70% marks.  
The number of credit hours needed to be completed for the award of a degree 
as well as minimum and maximum duration to complete Ph.D Programs shall 
be 03 – 08 years, according to the policies of the Higher Education 
Commission and the structure approved by BASR / Academic Council of Iqra 
University. 
5 
  
 
PROVISIONAL ADMISSION 
 
a) Students who are admitted provisionally in a semester either as a “result 
awaiting” candidate or on any other ground must meet the university 
admission eligibility requirements in the same semester and submit the 
relevant documents to the admission office at the earliest.  
 
b) Students who fail to meet the university admission eligibility requirements 
before the final exams of their first semester must withdraw their admission 
immediately. In cases where the student does not withdraw his/her admission 
and his/her ineligibility for admission is identified by the university at any 
stage, the university will cancel the admission with immediate effect.  
 
c) Result awaiting applicants are required to submit an undertaking along with 
the application as given in the annexure.  
 
INTER PROGRAMME TRANSFER 
 
a) A student registered in a program may not be transferred to another program 
in the University until he/she has obtained the permission of the Dean and   
Registrar’s office.  
 
b) A student who is on probation may not be allowed to transfer to another 
program.  
 
c) A student transfers from one discipline to another, if his performance is below 
2 CGPA in the first Discipline it will count against his performance in the 
second Discipline.  
 
d) Student must obtain an approval by the concerned Heads of the 
Departments.  
 
e) Permission to transfer will be given in writing using the form provided for this 
purpose. (see Annexure)  
 
f) No student will get credit transfer without the permission of the concerned   
Heads of the Departments and Registrar’s office.  
 
g) A student who seeks transfer to another programme will have to follow all the 
requirements and polices (such as fee etc.) of the new programme.  
 
h) The credits earned in any lower degree programme (bachelor’s or master’s) 
are nontransferable to the higher degree program.  
  
 
6  
 
 
i) Whenever a student's application to transfer to another program has been 
approved and all requirements related to such transfer satisfactorily fulfilled, 
the relevant program authority shall inform the concerned departments and 
forward the original documents to the student’s personal file.  
 
j) A credit transfer fee will be charged.  
   
 
INTER CAMPUS TRANSFER 
 
a) A student registered in a program may not be transferred to another 
program/Campus in the University until he/she has obtained the permission of 
the Dean and Registrar’s office and it is approved by the concerned Head of   
Department from where he/she is leaving.  
 
b) Permission to transfer will be given in writing using the form provided for this 
purpose. (See Annexure)  
 
c) A student who is on probation may not be allowed to transfer to another 
campus.  
 
d) A student who seeks transfer to another campus will have to follow all the 
requirements and polices (such as fee etc.) of the new campus.  
 
e) No campus will accept a credit transfer until the credit transfer form has been 
duly filled.  
 
f) A student who seeks transfer from one Campus to another campus in Karachi 
during an ongoing program will only be allowed to avail this facility provided 
the student clears all the courses that he has failed from the campus the 
student was originally enrolled.  
 
g) The credits earned in any lower degree programme (bachelor’s or master’s) 
are nontransferable to the higher degree program.  
 
 
Pre- Requisite for Other Disciplines: 
 
Candidates interested for admission in MBA/MS(CS)/MS(Tel),/MS(Adv/FTV) 
having bachelor degree other than 
BBA/BS(CS)/BS(Tel)/BS(ADV/FTV/ANM)/BE(EE)/ BE(TE) respectively have to do 
pre-requisite (deficiency) courses as specified in the prospectus or by the 
respective HoD/Dean. These pre-requisite courses will be in addition to the regular 
program courses. 
 
 
7  
  
Definition of a Credit Hour: 
 
 
An hour of work is the equivalent of 50 minutes of class time (often called a contact 
hour) or 60 minutes of independent-study work. Contact hours required for specific 
types of course are as follows: 
 
a. For theory Courses: 16 contact hours per credit   
b. For Laboratory courses: 32 contact hours per credit.  
 
Application for Credit Transfer: 
 
a) The application for credit transfer will be submitted by the student on a required 
form supported by the following document. 
 
i. The course outline and teaching plan of the course that was completed 
in a different University/Institution and which is being nominated for 
credit transfer.  
 
ii. The course contact hours and the name of the faculty who taught the 
course along with the relevant grades.  
 
Transfer Students: 
 
The determination of acceptability of credit for course work completed at another 
recognized Institution of higher learning is made solely at the discretion of Iqra 
University. The evaluation of any course work or exam from another Institution for 
acceptance by the University will be based only on an official transcript from the 
institution originally offering the course work or exam. 
 
i. Credit is not given for grades lower than a C+ or 67%.  
 
ii. All prospective transfer students must complete Iqra University’s 
entrance requirements.  
 
iii. Grades from other institutions are not included in the calculation of Iqra 
University grade point average.  
 
iv. Principally the maximum credits for work done before joining the Iqra   
University will be considered only up to 50% of the Bachelor’s and 
Master’s program to which the application is being made.  
 
v. The course work being sought for credit transfer has been completed at 
a HEC recognized educational institution.  
 
vi. Credit Transfer cases will not be entertained after a student has started 
the program of study.   
8  
vii. 
viii. 
ix. 
Remedial, vocational, technical, highly specialized and personal 
development courses are not accepted for credit.  
All transfer courses taken at bachelor level from Polytechnic Institutions 
with degree awarding status and foreign community Institutes that can 
award degrees will be reviewed individually by the Head of the 
Department and any transfers must be approved by the Dean and office 
of the Registrar.  
Students are advised to check with the Admissions Office and Head of 
Department to determine the acceptability of credit from other  
Institutions. Acceptability of transfer credits to a student’s academic 
curriculum is determined by the Head of the Department where the 
application is being made.  
b. Transfer of Credits for completion of IU Degree: 
Upto 18 Credit Hours, i.e. 06 Courses shall be allowed as transfer of credits 
from any recognized university/degree awarding institution during the period 
of entire degree program in which the student is enrolled subject to the 
conditions that prior permission from management has been obtained, 
atleast 60% of course content is similar to the course(s) offered at Iqra 
University, and the student has obtained 67%/C+ grade in the course(s) for 
which Credit Transfer is applied. For evaluating course content one course 
shall be matched with only one course of degree program. The student shall 
pay transfer fee @ 50% of the course fee. 
The students who have got Credit Transfer at the time of admission shall not 
be entitled of availing this facility. 
c. Conditions for Course Transfer:  
i. 
ii. 
iii. 
If the course content is similar to the course content at Iqra to the extent 
of a minimum 60%, the course credit will be considered for transfer.  
A lower level degree course is nontransferable to higher level degree 
program such as a course done at Bachelors level is nontransferable to 
Master program.  
A course exempted elsewhere is nontransferable until and unless it is 
pursued as a regular course.  
9 
  
d. Course Exemption:  
 
 
i. If any student is awarded with exemption in any of his course based on 
his past academic or work orientation then that course will be replaced 
by another course. The course exemption will not reduce the total 
number of required courses or credit hours.  
 
ii. The decision of the Head of the Department in accepting or rejecting a 
case of course exemption will be final.  
 
iii. In case of exemption a course exemption form must be properly filled.  
  
 
Registration 
 
Registration Process: 
 
 
Students have to follow the following rules of the registration process: 
 
1. All students have to fill the registration form and have to submit it on due 
date to the concerned authority. Late registration forms will not be accepted 
unless otherwise approved by the Head of the Department with penalty. In 
programs where online registration facility is available, student must register 
on-line.  
 
2. Students can choose a maximum of 6 courses per regular semester in 
Undergraduate Program and a graduating student may be permitted by the 
Head of the Department to take up to 7 courses and within specified period 
only (provided the said offering does not reduces the minimum time period 
of completing the degree). The course load will be reduced to half in 
Summer semester.  
 
3. Registration forms must be filled in full with care (Where applicable). 
Incomplete or incorrect forms will not be entertained.  
 
4. Students should register themselves in the appropriate modules, which may 
be published by the Department from time to time and pay the prescribed 
fee.  
 
5. Management reserves the right to withdraw any course after its offering or 
change its timings or instructors. Student can drop his/her registration from 
the said course only if there is any time clash with any other course he/she 
is registered in.  
 
 
10  
 
 
6. A course can be offered only if the number of students who have paid the 
fee for the course are not less than 20. HOD/ Dean’s/ office of the 
Registrar’s decision will be final in such cases.  
 
7. Whenever a student's application for registration in courses has been 
approved and all requirements related to such Registration of Courses have 
been satisfactorily fulfilled, the relevant program authority shall inform the 
concerned departments and shall forward the original document to the 
student’s personal file. In case of online registration the courses are offered 
according to curriculum and once taken/locked by the student are binding 
upon the student.  
 
8. The student must also check the exam schedule before registering in the 
courses in case of clash in examinations date(s), the course will be dropped 
without any adjustment of fee.  
 
 
Add & Drop of Courses:  
Add & Drop of courses will not be entertained after the announced registration 
dates are over. Some consideration could be given to the students within one week 
of the beginning of classes, on special grounds (like medical disability) and Head of 
the  
Department’s/Registrar’s decision will be final. There will be no adjustment of 
attendance for the sessions missed by the students. 
 
1. A student registered in a program may not Add & Drop a course in the 
University unless he/she has obtained the permission from the Head of 
Department responsible for the program. Add/Drop will only be entertained 
during stipulated period of time.  
 
2. If there is additional fee involved a student has to pay the fee before 
attending the respective course.  
 
 
Withdrawal from Course: 
 
1. Students can withdraw from a particular course with the consent of the 
concerned department.  
 
2. Students can withdraw from a maximum of 02 courses in one semester. 
This should be within one week of the announcement of mid-term or 1st 
hourly results or a maximum of ten weeks from the start of classes. There is 
no refund of fee.  
 
3. Whenever a student's application to withdraw from the course(s) has been 
approved and all requirements related to such withdrawal satisfactorily 
fulfilled, the relevant program authority shall inform the examinations and   
11  
 
 
forward the original document to the Students personal file. Also “W” grade 
will be mentioned on the transcript. 
 
4. Withdrawal from courses will not be allowed in cases where the student’s 
absences have exceeded beyond the permitted quota (20%) by the 
university.  
  
 
Term or Permanent Withdrawal from University: 
 
1. A student who finds it necessary to be excused from registration in a 
program in any semester must formally request a leave of absence from the 
Faculty (or the concerned Department). The Head of Faculty (or the 
concerned Department) and the Registrar’s office must approve leave 
application.  
 
2. Withdrawals from university are entitled to refund of fee according to the 
following schedule:  
 
Up to 7th day of commencement of classes:  100% refund of tuition fee  
 
From 8th - 15th day of commencement of classes: 50% refund of tuition fees 
From 16th day of commencement of classes: No Fee (0%) refund  
   
3. Whenever a student's application to withdraw from the semester or from the 
university has been approved and all requirements related to such 
withdrawal satisfactorily fulfilled, the relevant program authority shall inform 
the concerned departments and forward the original document to the 
Students personal file.  
 
University Rejoining: 
 
1. When a student returns from a leave of absence, the prevailing Academic 
(program of studies), Fee (if increased) and other policies will be applicable.  
 
2. A student will be allowed to rejoin the university within the span of one (01) 
year provided the leave of absence must not exceed duration of the 
program as prescribed by the regulatory authorities and approved by the 
Academic Council.  
     
 
12  
Double Specialization: 
1. A student may concurrently fulfill the requirements of two subject majors 
provided the student has the permission of the Head of Faculty (or the 
concerned Department & the selected electives have no clash in Exams). 
Upon successful completion of the requirements of both majors, one degree 
is awarded.  
2. Students have to do required number of courses for each major as specified 
by the concerned Faculty (or the concerned Department).  
3. The two majors earned concurrently under one degree will be noted on the 
transcript.  
4. For the second specialization, registration form must be filled with the 
department to declare the two specializations.  
5. After the issuance of complete transcript the student may also opt for double 
specialization. However, revised transcript will not be issued. The student 
will be awarded with Separate Certificate (s) for the courses he/she has 
passed as electives of Bi-Majors.  
Program Regulations 
The Program Regulations for each program shall include a listing of the constituent 
courses of the program and indicate the division of the program into Parts. Course 
Specifications (outline) shall be published for each course shall include information 
on its aims and objectives, its content, its level, the semester in which it is offered, 
its weightage, and the methods of teaching and learning and assessment. They 
shall also indicate any prerequisites for studying the courses. Where Program 
Regulations permit a choice of courses options, a candidate's selection of courses 
will normally be subject to approval by the HOD/Chairperson of the concerned 
department. It is not possible to guarantee that all optional courses will be offered 
every semester. Course Specifications will also indicate availability. 
1. In each part of a program, except during a period of industrial or 
professional training (Internship), candidates are required to register for 
courses, as specified in the relevant Program Regulations.  
2. All students shall register at the beginning of each semester (on the 
announced dates) for the courses which they are taking in that semester.  
13 
  
Status of Students:  
The status of a student as such shall end when any one or more of the following 
occurs: 
 
1. on successful completion of his/her program of study   
2. on withdrawal from the University   
3. on termination of his/her studies by the Disciplinary committee   
4. on expulsion from the University   
5. on lapse of his/her registration for a higher degree  
 
 
Full-time Student Status:  
Full-time status for an undergraduate student varies with the Institute and study 
program, but ordinarily requires a load of at least 15 credits per semester. Full-time 
status for graduate students is more widely variable, depending upon the 
composition of the individual student’s program. Students in doubt about their 
standing should check with the Dean’s Office. 
 
Performance Requirements: 
 
A - Attendance Requirement :  
1. Attendance in person, at all prescribed and elective lectures and seminars is 
mandatory. Maximum of 20% absences are allowed in a subject to cater for 
emergencies, sickness etc. There is no provision of leaves in excess of the 
allowance mentioned above. 20% or more absences in a subject will result 
in ‘F’ grade in that subject. Any student, who fails to comply with the rules, 
forfeits the right to appear at the examination in the course concerned. Such 
a situation shall earn the student ‘F’ (failure) in the course.   
2. The students who join the semester late because of any reason shall be 
marked absent for the previous classes. In case, more than 20% of the 
sessions have been completed by the faculty the student shall earn ‘F’   
Grade.   
3. In addition to punctuality and meeting the prescribed attendance 
requirements, each student is required to actively participate in the class 
and complete their assignments on time.  
 
B - Academic Promotions:  
1. All students must obtain minimum GPA in their first semester in order to be 
eligible for promotion into next semester. In case if a student does not pass 
any of the course, he/she shall be dismissed from the University.   
2. The minimum requirement for semester progression is 2.0 GPA. If 
otherwise, the student shall be placed on first academic warning.   
3. If the student continue to obtain less than 2.0 GPA in second semester 
consecutively throughout the Degree Program, he/she will be placed on 
second academic warning (Probation).  
 
 
14  
 
 
4. The Student who does not improve his/her GPA to 2.0 after second 
academic warning (Probation) shall be expelled from the University.  
 
C - Award of Degree:  
A student, in order to become eligible for award of degree, must attain a 
graduating CGPA of 2.5. 
 
Assessment  
Assessments in courses or programs of study mean formal written examinations, 
continuous assessment, projects or any other academic exercise subject to 
assessment as specified in course or program regulations. 
 
1. The assessment includes Case Studies, Assignments, Quizzes, Class 
Workshops, Semester Projects, Mid-term / Hourlies and Final Examination.  
 
2. A student shall be mainly examined on Mid-term / Hourlies and Final 
examinations and the results will be posted on the notice board of the 
respective programs or online on website.  
 
3. All examinations shall be conducted on the scheduled dates. No make up 
for quiz / test / mid-term / Hourly or final examination will be arranged.  
 
 
Grading System and Cumulative Grade Point 
 
1. The following grading system will be followed 
 
A 88% - 100% 4.0 Excellent 
B+ 81% - 87% 3.5 Very Good 
B 74% - 80% 3.0 Good 
C+ 67% - 73% 2.5 Average 
C 60% - 66% 2.0 Below Average 
F Below 60% 0.0 Failure (course repeat) 
I    Incomplete 
W    Withdrawal 
K    Course in progress  
Incomplete Grade: 
 
The grade of “I” may be awarded only at the end of a Semester, when all but a 
minor portion of the course work has been satisfactorily completed. The reasons 
for award of I grade include extension given in submission of “term report”, ‘Project 
Report”, Assignments. The reasons also include “compulsion on account of which 
student is unable to attend Final Term Exam Paper”. 
 
“I” grade can only be awarded to a maximum of two courses in one semester.  
15  
  
 
The compulsion for not being able to attend the Exam Paper must be supported by 
verifiable evidence. 
 
Arriving late in the exam hall shall not be considered as compulsion. However, for 
graduating semester students a team comprising of Director/Dy. Registrar and 
Dean of concerned department shall assess the case for approval rejection of the 
request for I Grade. 
 
“I” grade is not to be awarded when the student is expected to repeat the 
course. On account of low marks or attendance. 
 
After the deficiency is replenished, the Instructor will assign the appropriate grade 
on a Change of Grade form/Student’s application, get it approved by the Dean and 
submit it to the Office of the Registrar / Examinations for processing. 
 
I grade would remain valid only for one semester. In case if the course in which I 
grade is awarded is not offered in the subsequent semester, the ‘I’ grade shall 
remain valid till the next semester when the course offered. 
 
Incomplete grades do not enter into the calculation of the grade-point average for 
Semester or till the offering from the date of the award. 
 
If the incomplete grade is not changed by the concerned authorities within the 
stipulated period, the I grade will revert to a failing grade ‘F’. 
 
 
Make-Up Exam Policy: 
 
There is no make-up exam policy of the university. Whereas students who miss 
their mid term exams because of their hospitalization or the death of any of the 
following:  
i. Parent(s)   
ii. Sibling(s)   
iii. Spouse   
iv. Children   
Not more than 2 days prior to exams or during the examinations, will have the 
weight-age of marks transferred to the final exam with 10% deduction. If there are 
cases where the HOD feels a genuine reason of weight-age transfer the case may 
be forwarded to Dean and Registrar for special consideration. 
 
Course in Progress: 
 
The grade of K may be awarded by the Instructor for courses when the course 
continues for longer than one semester such as Thesis. K grades remain on the 
 
16  
student’s permanent record until removed with a final grade but do not enter into 
the calculation of the grade-point average. 
Grade Appeal Policy
A student may appeal a grade by using the following procedures. Grade appeals are 
not processed during the summer sessions unless the De an determines a case 
warrants immediate review. 
Written verification of each step below is critical. Steps three, five, and seven 
require the student to submit written appeal. Therefore, either mail the appeal via 
return receipt or deliver it to the appropriate office and have a staff member verify 
the date and time of delivery. The Dean’s decision on whether or not the deadlines 
have been met is final. The Dean has authority to extend the deadlines, but only in 
extraordinary circumstances shall the appeal extend beyond the first regular 
Semester. 
Step 1: Within the first five weeks of the semester, the student should discuss the 
concerns with the course instructor, stating the reasons for questioning the grade. If 
the Instructor is a teaching assistant/as sociate and this interview does not resolve 
the difficulty, the student shall discuss the problem with the person in charge of the 
course. 
Step 2: Within the first five weeks of the semester, the student shall go to the 
Dean's Office to obtain any requisite forms and to review directions. The student 
must attest in writing that he/she has informed the instructor he/she intends to file a 
grade appeal. 
Step 3: Within the first week of the semester, the student shall carefully formulate 
an appeal in writing, and submit it to the instructor with a copy to the department 
head. 
Step 4: Within two weeks from the date of receipt of the student's written statement, 
the instructor shall respond to the student in writing. The instructor should explain 
the grading procedures and how the grade in question was determined as well as 
other issues raised in the student's statement. 
Stop 5: If the instructor is not available or does not resolve the matter within the 
two-week period, the student shall, within one week thereafter, readdress and 
submit the written appeal to the Department Head. 
Step 6: The department head has two weeks to consider the student’s written 
statement, the instructor's written statement, and confer with each. The department 
head, who does not have the authority to change the grade, shall inform the 
instructor and the student in writing of his/her 
17 
recommendation. If a grade change is recommended, the instructor may refuse to 
accept the recommendation. The instructor shall notify the Department Head and 
the student in writing of his/her decision. 
Step 7: If the Department Head does not act on or resolve this matter within a two 
weeks period, the student shall, within one week thereafter, readdress and submit 
the written appeal to the Dean. 
Step 8: The Dean shall convene a committee to review the case. The committee 
consists of four members including Dean, Faculty representatives include the 
instructor himself or herself and one from the same Department, and one senior 
faculty member from another Department. 
Within the structure provided by the Dean, the committee shall design its own rules 
of operation and select a chair other than the faculty representative from the 
Department concerned. 
The committee may or may not: 
 Meet separately with the student, the instructor, and the department head. 

 Request each party to submit a brief written summary statement of the 
issues, and/or 
 Interview other person(s) who have relevant information. 
If feasible, the committee should meet with the student and the instructor, together in 
an attempt to resolve the difference. The Committee shall consider all aspects of the 
case before making its recommendation. T he Committee shall make a written report 
with recommendations and provide copies to the student, the instructor, the 
department head, and the Dean. 
Step 9: The Dean shall make a final decision after full consideration of the 
committee's recommendation within four weeks of receiving the student’s appeal. 
The Dean has the authority to change the grade and the registrar shall accept the 
Dean’s decision. The department head, the instructor, and the student shall be 
notified in writing of the Dean's decision. 
18 
  
Scrutiny and Recheck Policy for Final Examinations Only: 
 
The following procedure for scrutiny of answer scripts is to be followed. 
 
1. Any student desirous of getting his/her answer script (s) scrutinized may 
apply on the prescribed form available with Students Information Center.  
 
2. Scrutiny will be restricted to :  
 
i. Checking of ‘total marks’ on the answer script & rectification of any 
discrepancies found as a result of such scrutiny.   
ii. Marking of any question found unmarked & rectification of the total.  
 
3. Scrutiny fee as prescribed from time to time has to be paid.  
 
The following procedure for Re-checking of answer script(s) is to be 
followed.  
 
i. Any student desirous of getting his/her answer script (s) Re-checked 
can apply on the prescribed form available with Students Information 
Center.  
 
ii. Re-checking of answer script(s) shall be conducted by two instructors 
but other than the instructor who had taught and had marked the 
answer script(s).  
 
iii. Photocopies of answer script(s) (with no information of the student’s 
identity, marks, etc) shall be provided to each of the two instructors for 
re-checking alongwith the answer script(s) of the lowest and highest 
scorer for comparison.  
 
iv. Average of marks shall be ascertained from the two re-checked 
answer script(s).  
 
v. After re-checking of answer script(s), the decision of the University 
whatsoever it is shall be final and unchangeable. The grading after 
rechecking shall supersede the earlier result.  
 
vi. Rechecking fee as prescribed from time to time has to be paid.  
         
 
19  
Examination Rules for Students:
1. Switch your cell phones off and do not leave them on mute/vibration/offline 
mode. If anyone’s cell phone is found switched on, it will be considered as 
attempt of cheating.  
2. All answers intended for the examinations must be written on both sides of 
the pages of the Answer Scripts and not on one side only. Supplement will be 
provided only when the candidate has fully written out on both sides of the 
pages of the Answer Script.  
3. No loose paper will be provided to use for rough work and no paper is to be 
brought in for the purpose. All work must be done in the answer script 
provided and the pages used for rough work or calculation(s) must be struck 
out by drawing a line through each page so used from top to bottom and no 
page should be torn out.  
4. Candidates are forbidden to write any answer or anything else on the 
question paper or any material or carry away any writing from the 
examinations hall.  
5. No Candidate will be allowed to leave examination hall until one hour has 
elapsed from the time when the question paper is given, or re-enter 
examination hall after leaving it, after finally giving his/her answer book.  
30  mins have
6. To draw the attention of the invigilator the candidate may simply raise hand 
without making any noise or disturbance.  
7. A candidate while in the examinations shall not help or try to help any other 
candidate nor obtain or try to get help from any other candidate. 
Communication of any sort between candidate and any other person, inside 
or outside the examinations hall is strictly prohibited. Stringent punishment 
will be meted out to students who are found in possession of notes, books, 
scribbling or making any attempt to use unfair means.  
8. Candidates are requested to ensure that on the day of examinations they 
arrive 15 minutes before the start of examinations.  
mins
9. No students shall be admitted to the examinations hall/room later than one 
hour after the start of the examinations and no extra time shall be given.  
  30
10. Personal belongings of students including books, pencil cases and bags, etc 
shall be left in the place designated for this purpose at the examinations hall 
without any responsibility to IU.  
20 
11. Each student is required to place his/her ID card on the desk in the 
examinations hall for the duration of his/her examinations. Attempts at 
impersonation of any candidate shall lead to cancellation of examinations.  
12. Borrowing of stationery is strictly not allowed during the examinations.  
13. No student shall be allowed to sit in a section other than the section in which 
he/she is originally registered.  
14. Candidates will fill all the information on the answer scripts along with their 
signature.  
15. Invigilator has the right to expel any student from the examinations hall on 
any attempt of cheating, misconduct or any other behavior they feel 
inappropriate without any recourse.  
16. When the Invigilator announces the end of the examinations, the students 
shall stop writing immediately and remain seated silently until permitted to 
leave the examinations hall by the Invigilator.  
17. Any type of calculator may be used provided that the calculator is hand held, 
battery operated or solar-powered, noiseless and has no facility for the 
storage of alphabetical information other than hexadecimal numbers.  
18. Calculators must be available for inspection by the Invigilators.  
19. No other electronic aids are permitted such as mobile phones/digital diaries 
etc in the examinations hall. Any student found possessing these electronic 
aids shall be liable to cancellation of that paper, removal from Examinations 
hall, suspension for next semester, and/or expulsion from University.  
Probation / Dismissal of Students
A. Probation: 
i. 
ii. 
iii. 
A student can be placed on academic warning status if his/her semester GPA 
will fall below 2.0 in a semester. The GPA will be calculated with the F-grades 
included.  
If the GPA remains below 2.00 (calculated with F-Grades secured) in the 
second semester attended, the student will be placed on probation.  
If the semester GPA of the student remains below 2.00 for 3 consecutively 
attended semesters, his/her admission will be cancelled from the university.  
21 
 
 
iv. A student on probation will be allowed to take only 50% of the normal 
semester course load.  
 
v. The said student once dismissed cannot be granted admission in same or 
any other program of the University. Any student found taking admission, 
after dismissal, in any program, on any campus of Iqra University, will have 
the admission cancelled, without any warning and with no refund of fee.  
 
 
B. Termination:  
 
i. The said student once dismissed cannot be granted admission in same or 
any other program of the University. Any student found taking admission, 
after dismissal, in any program, on any campus of Iqra University, will have 
the admission cancelled, without any warning and with no refund of fee.  
 
ii. Students who have up to 6 courses remaining for completing a program will 
be given one extra chance. Research Project I & II and Thesis I & II are not 
counted in six (06) courses.  
 
Disciplinary Requirements  
i. All students are required to observe the University's Charter, Statutes, 
Ordinances and Regulations.  
 
ii. Every student shall be subject to such disciplinary regulations as may be 
made from time to time by the management of the university.  
 
iii. All members of the University and other persons authorized for the purpose 
shall have authority, and it shall be their duty, to check disorderly or 
improper conduct or any breach of regulation by members of the University 
in any of the University premises or in the University grounds.  
 
iv. Any member of the academic staff may, if he/she deems it necessary, 
require any student who is guilty of disorderly or improper conduct in a 
Lecture Room or Laboratory to withdraw from the room, and shall bring the  
 
 
22  
 
 
offence to the notice of the Head of the department concerned, Disciplinary 
Committee and the Registrar of the University. 
 
v. Students shall be held responsible for making themselves acquainted with 
all Ordinances, Regulations and official notices which affect them.  
 
vi. It shall be the duty of all students of the University in all their acts and 
demeanor to observe and maintain honest and peaceful behavior at all times 
within the precincts of the University and adjacent areas.  
 
vii. All campuses of Iqra University are no smoking zones.  
 
viii. For the safety and security measure, Vehicles with tinted glasses are not 
allowed in the IU premises.  
 
ix. Wearing sandals and slippers on campus is not permitted.  
 
x. The Librarian shall be especially responsible for maintaining order in the 
Library. The Librarian may require any person who is guilty of disorderly or 
improper conduct or of any breach of regulations to withdraw from the 
Library.  
 
 
Disciplinary Suspension or Dismissal: 
 
i. The university reserves the right to suspend or dismiss a student for violation 
of its:  
 
a) Policies   
b) Regulations   
c) Discipline Code or Unbecoming Conduct   
d) Shortage of Attendance   
e) Attempting to use unfair means during classes, quizzes or 
examinations.   
f) Representing Political Party (ies) / Chanting Political Slogans / 
Carrying Flags / Badges / Disseminating Political Literature  
 
ii. Management decision in all student matters shall be final.  
 
iii. Fines or other penalties may be imposed by the Disciplinary Committee, or 
by any other person to whom the Committee has delegated powers to act on 
its behalf, on any student of the University for any Infraction of regulations, or 
for any act or behavior which is detrimental to the good order of the 
University.  
   
 
23  
iv. 
A student of the University may be required to bear the cost of making good 
any damage to University property for which he/she may be responsible, 
which may be in addition to a fine or other penalty which he/she may have 
incurred in connection therewith.  
Punishment (s) for Disciplinary Breach / Affair
A. Card Exchange by Students of IU  
03 – days suspension to the student who has used IU ID card of other 
student for getting inside university. In case if student has any presentation 
or quiz, a Fine of Rs.3,000/- in lieu of suspension. 
05 – days suspension to the student who has given IU ID card of other 
student for getting inside university. In case if student has any presentation 
or quiz, a Fine of Rs.5,000/- in lieu of suspension. 
B. Use of IU Student (s) ID Card by outsider(s).  
21 – days suspension to the student. In case if student has any 
presentation or quiz, a Fine of Rs.25,000/- in lieu of suspension. 
C. 
D. 
E. 
F. 
Use of Fake IU Student (s) ID Card (Colored copied Card/Forged)  
Suspension of Semester  
Entrance into University without ID Card  
With permission by Guard (s) / Coordinator (s) / EDP subject to payment of 
Rs.200/- 
Lost / Snatched University ID Card  
Re-issue of New Card Subject to Payment of Rs.500/- 
Indiscipline in the Class Room / Labs  
 In Case of Complaint by Teacher: 
 Immediate suspension from the class 
 Disciplinary Committee Meeting 
 Investigation through coordinator / other class students. 
 Course Drop  / Fail 
G. Indiscipline within the precinct of University (Includes Parking & 
Adjacent Area)  
In case of fight between / among students, Use of Abusive 
language.  
 Immediate suspension 
 Disciplinary Committee Meeting 
24 
 If found guilty 
 Expulsion from University 
Against appeal minimum: 
 21 – days suspension to the student. In case if student has any 
presentation or quiz, a Fine of Rs.25,000/- in lieu of suspension. 
Use of drugs 



H. 

I. 
 Immediate suspension 
 Disciplinary Committee Meeting 
 If found guilty 
 Expulsion from University 
Against appeal: 
 Regrets 
Gender Harassment (by Phone, by SMS, by e-mail, by Face Book 
Comment)  
 Immediate suspension 
 Investigation through all possible sources 
 Disciplinary Committee Meeting 
 If found guilty 
 02 Semester Suspension 
Against Appeal: 
 Apology to be posted on FaceBook 
 Apology in front of Victim and entire class 
 10 days community work within University. 
 Submission of Affidavit for not repeating such act(s) 
 Rs.10,000 fine 
Defamation of University / Faculty / Policy by 
students Using anonymous e-mail  
Using all social networks (in use today or may arise in 
future) 
 Immediate suspension 
 Investigation through all possible sources 
 Disciplinary Committee  Meeting 
 If found guilty 
 Expulsion from University 
25 
Against Appeal: 
 02 Semester Suspension 
 Apology to be posted on FaceBook 
 Apology in front of Victim and entire class 
 10 days community work within University. 
 Rs.10,000 fine 

J. 
K. 
Unethical Activities:  
Violation of norms and values / Violation of proximity limits  
 Immediate suspension 
 Investigation through all possible sources 
 Disciplinary Committee  Meeting 
 If found guilty 
 01 semester suspension by Semester Withdrawal 
Against Appeal: 
Regrets. 
Involving others or getting involved in Political Activities at Campus /  
Representing Political Party (ies) / Chanting Political Slogans / Carrying 
Flags / Badges / Disseminating Political Literature 
 Immediate suspension 
 Investigation through all possible sources 
 Disciplinary Committee  Meeting 
 If found guilty 
 Expulsion 
Against Appeal: 
Regrets. 
Disciplinary Committee
1) The composition of the Disciplinary Committee is as follows:  
a) Campus Director/Registrar or his/her nominee (Chairman)  
b) Deputy Registrar  
c) Head of Department of the Concerned Department  
d) One senior faculty member  
2) The working procedure of the Disciplinary Committee is as follows:  
i. 
All complaints of breach of discipline by any Iqra student(s) will be 
forwarded to Disciplinary Committee.  
26 
ii. 
iii. 
iv. 
v. 
vi. 
vii. 
viii. 
ix. 
x. 
The Committee will consider the Complaint and in serious cases may 
decide to issue a show cause notice and require a written reply from the 
concerned student(s) within 3 days.  
The Committee will deliberate on the reply received and if satisfied that no 
breach of discipline has occurred may dispose off the complaint; or  
May decide to hold an inquiry by an inquiry officer or panel, in the case 
which may require attendance/hearing of all the students/teachers/others 
involved in the proceedings, however personal hearing may be given to 
the accused before the award of punishment.  
All proceedings of the Disciplinary Committee will be recorded in writing 
and signed by the attending members.  
On the basis of inquiry the Disciplinary Committee will announce its 
recommendations within 3 days after completing its proceedings.  
The recommended punishment if any may range from issuing of a written 
warning to the rustication of the student(s) involved.  
The affected student(s) may appeal to the president of Iqra University, 
within one week of the announced decision through the office of the 
student affairs.  
All employees and the students of Iqra University will cooperate and assist 
the Disciplinary Committee in carrying out their duties. For this purpose 
the Disciplinary Committee may require any student(s)/teacher or other 
employee of the Iqra University to attend this meeting.  
The required quorum for holding any meeting of the Disciplinary 
Committee is 3.  
Submission & Procession of Application:
All applications must be submitted to the SIC on prescribed form(s) manually or 
online. Receipt of application submitted must be collected from the SIC coordinator, 
in case of manual application. No claim would be accepted without the student 
receipt. 
27 
REGULATIONS FOR MPHIL / PHD DEGREE
INTRODUCTION:
This document sets out the regulations governing the award of the degree of Master 
of Philosophy and Doctorate of Philosophy (PhD) at Iqra University. The major 
emphasis of the program of the study is on the development of the specialized 
knowledge and research skills that are necessary to conduct scholarly research and 
to be an effective professional. The Phil/PhD degree is awarded in a field of study 
through original and substantial contribution to knowledge. 
1. 
COMMENCEMENT: 
These regulations shall come into force from January 2009. 
2. 
2.1 
2.2 
2.3 
2.4 
2.5 
DEFINITIONS: 
Admissions Committee is a departmental committee which receives a 
formal application for admission in a PhD program and recommends 
admission of a candidate to BASAR. It will consist of the Dean of the faculty, 
Chairperson and one senior member of the concerned department.  
Advisory Committee is a committee before whom the proposals are 
presented by the candidate. This committee shall give its recommendations to 
BASAR on a prescribed format. This committee shall consist of:  
i. 
ii. 
iii. 
Dean of the faculty concerned.  
Chairperson of the department concerned.  
Principal Supervisor  
iv. Two experts in the field of research from within the University or 
outside to be nominated by the Dean.  
Principal Supervisor is a person who is mainly responsible for the 
supervision of research of a candidate. He/She may be a full time teacher of 
the University or a person from any other university/organization specializing 
in the field of related research. The Supervisor should hold a PhD degree 
from a recognized university.  
Co-Supervisor is person who helps the Principal supervisor in supervising 
the research of the candidate because of knowledge/experience in related 
research. Co-Supervisor can be appointed from within the University or 
outside and should hold a PhD degree. In case the Principal Supervisor is 
from outside the University, the co-supervisor shall from the University.  
Course Credits are the total credit hours of the courses to be taken as a first 
module of the PhD program, as defined in section 5.2.  
28 
2.6 Proposal Defense is the first seminar which a candidate has to present after 
passing the requisite number of course credits. In this seminar the candidate 
shall propose the research title and methodology before the advisory 
committee. 
3. 
3.1 
3.2 
3.3 
3.4 
3.5 
3.6 
4. 

5. 
5.1 
CRITERIA AND PROCEDURE FOR ADMISSION / ENROLMENT 
To get admitted into the PhD program, a candidate must hold a relevant 
Masters Degree with 18 years of education from a recognized institution with 
a minimum CGPA of 3.00 or equivalent.  
In addition candidates must pass subject GRE (international) test for 
admission in PhD as prescribed by the HEC or GAT Subject with minimum of 
60% marks.  
An applicant for admission to the program shall submit to the Admission 
Committee of the department, the proposed major subject area of research 
work to be undertaken by him / her for this degree along with his / her 
particulars on the prescribed application form.  
The Admission Committee shall asses the suitability of each candidate on the 
basis of academic and professional qualifications, professional experience, 
reasons for desiring to enroll in the program, referees opinions, and shall 
submit recommendations to BASAR. Subsequent to approval of the proposal 
by BASAR, the candidate will be admitted into the PhD program.  
Once admitted to the program, a candidate may enroll either as full time or a 
part time candidate.  
No student shall, without the prior permission of the BASAR, join any other 
course of study or appear at any other examination to be conducted by any 
other university or public body.  
SCHEME OF STUDY 
1. 
The program consists of two modules.  
 Course Work and Independent Study. 
 Research Work 
COURSE WORK AND INDEPENDENT STUDY 
Course work will be based upon a written plan briefly setting out the 
educational outcomes expected from the course, a list of topics to be covered 
and the prescribed reading material. The course work will be planned jointly  
29 
by the candidate and the supervisor. The PhD research period will commence 
after the candidate has completed his/her course work, independent study 
requirements and presented the first seminar (Section 6.1). 
5.2 
5.3 
i. 
ii. 
6. 
A student having a 4 years university degree must complete at least 36 credit 
hours at M.Phil / MS level and 18 credit hours of course work and 18 credit 
hours of Dissertation at PhD level for the award of the relevant degree.  
Comprehensive Examination:  
On completing the course work there will be a comprehensive examination. If 
a student is not able to succeed in the comprehensive examination then he / 
she shall be given two more chances to clear the examination.  
Procedure: 
Essential for the award of Ph.D. degree, Student must pass the test after 
finishing the coursework and before starting the dissertation. 
Major thrust: Tests students’ knowledge and understanding of the courses 
studied in the Ph.D. program. 
Form: 
Courses covered in the Ph.D. program 
Written. 
Nature: Subjective 
Contents: 
To be Prepared and evaluated by: 
3 experts in the field relevant to the courses studied by the candidate to 
be approved by BASR from the list provided by the Dean of the faculty.  
60% questions should be from the area of  specialization of candidate  
Duration: 
3 hours 
Evaluation:   Pass/Fail 
RESEARCH WORK AT PhD LEVEL
.  
Research work at PhD level shall consist of the following programs.  
i. 
ii. 
iii. 
iv. 
The First Seminar which is the Proposal Defense  
Supervision  
Publication  
Final Seminar / Dissertation Defense.  
30 
6.1 
The First Seminar / Proposal Defense  
All PhD students must defend the proposal before the advisory committee before 
starting the research work. The proposal must be written according to the format 
provided by BASAR. 
6.2 
Modification of Research Title / Migration  
6.2.1 A candidate may, within a year of his/her proposal defense, modify the 
subject of his/her research with the approval of BASAR on submitting an 
application recommended by the supervisor through the Dean concerned to 
BASAR. In such a case, BASAR shall determine the minimum number of 
years after which the thesis may be submitted.  
6.2.2 Research students migrating from other universities may be given exemptions  
of terms by   BASAR  on  the  recommendation  of  the  HOD  and  the  Dean 
concerned. 
6.3 
Supervision:  
6.3.1 The Principal Supervisor appointed by the Dean shall be responsible for 
guiding the candidate in development of the Research Proposal and for 
working on the Research Plan.  
6.3.2 Where needed the Dean shall appoint a co-supervisor with the consent of the 
student.  
6.3.3 If the Principal Supervisor is unable to continue, a new supervisor should be 
appointed within 01 month of the original Supervisor’s departure by the Dean 
and with the agreement of the candidate.  
6.3.4 The candidate and the Principal Supervisor must meet at least once a month.  
6.4 
6.5 
Publications  
All PhD students are required to write at least one research paper and get it 
accepted for publication in a refereed journal recognized by the HEC.  
Leave of Absence / Cancellation  
6.5.1 A candidate, who is temporarily unable to continue research because of 
unavoidable circumstances, should file an application to BASAR through the  
31 
Supervisor for temporary suspension from the program. Such leave of 
absence shall not exceed 12 months. 
6.5.2 On return from the leave, the Dean, on the recommendation of the 
Supervisor, may allow the student to continue and inform BASAR.  
6.5.3 Admission of any candidate enrolled in the program may be cancelled by the 
BASAR under the following circumstances:  
i. 
ii. 
iii. 
6.6 
If a candidate is not regular in research work.  
If a candidate is involved in any serious disciplinary action.  
If a candidate fails to demonstrate satisfactory progress.  
Submission of Dissertation:  
6.6.1 Four copies of the final thesis draft will be submitted by the candidate to the 
BASAR in temporary binding.  
6.6.2 BASAR will send these copies to two external (foreign) examiners from 
technologically advanced countries. In case of art, humanities & social 
sciences the foreign experts may be from academically advanced countries. 
These examiners shall be chosen by the Vice Chancellor from a list 
recommended by the Advisory Committee and approved by BASAR. The 
thesis must conform to the thesis writing guide lines by the University.  
6.6.3 Where one examiner accepts the thesis and second examiner rejects it the 
BASAR may exercise any of the following options.  
i. 
ii. 
The BASAR may accept the positive report with recommendation to 
make the amendments in light of negative evaluation.  
Where BASAR accepts the reports it recommends the thesis for oral 
defense.  
6.6.4 A student must submit his/her thesis no later than the maximum prescribed 
time limit. BASAR shall review all cases of the candidates who are unable to 
submit their thesis within the maximum prescribed period. Extension in the 
period of research may be awarded by BASAR to the deserving students on 
the recommendation of the Advisory committee.  
6.6.5 The BASAR will send the thesis through Controller of Examinations and 
evaluations must be received by the same office.  
32 
6.7 
Dissertation Defense / Award of Degree.  
6.7.1 Within two months of the approval of PhD dissertation by BASAR, the 
candidate will be asked to defend his/her PhD dissertation. The final seminar 
will be held according to the following procedures:  
i. 
ii. 
iii. 
The supervisor in consultation with the Advisory Committee will fix the 
date and time of the seminar.  
Examiner’s panel shall consist of two external examiners from within the 
country, the supervisor, Chairperson and the Dean of the concerned 
department.  
The Dean shall act as the Chairperson of the Examiners’ panel.  
iv. The Examiner’s panel shall communicate the decision to the BASAR in 
prescribed form.  
v. The candidate will be informed by the supervisor about the examination 
result.  
6.7.2 All faculty members of the university will be invited to the final seminar.  
6.7.3 On the instruction of the Examiners’ Panel, the candidate may be required to 
make minor changes in the thesis.  
6.7.4 When the student has made the required changes, three hardbound copies of 
the thesis in final form will be submitted to the university – original and one 
copy for the university‘s library and one copy for the departmental use, along 
with the certificate of the satisfactory completion of the examination process 
signed by the supervisor and the Dean.  
6.7.5 BASAR approves reports if the Examiner’s Panel before whom the Defense 
has been held. When all the requirements for the degree of Doctorate of 
Philosophy (PhD) are complete, the degree shall be conferred to the 
candidate with all its privileges.  
7. 
PERIOD OF TIME FOR COMPLETION OF RESEARCH PROGRAM. 
a.  The minimum period of research is: 
Full-time  candidates:  Three  years 
presentation of the Research Proposal. 
from  the  date  of  successful 
Part-time candidates: Five years from the date of successful 
presentation of the Research Proposal. 
33 
  
 
b.  The maximum period of research is: 
 
Full-time candidates: Five years from the date of successful 
presentation of the Research Proposal. 
 
Part-time candidates: Eight years from the date of successful 
presentation of the Research Proposal. 
                                                     
 
34  
ORICGUIDELINES FOR RESEARCH PROJECT 
II-BBA AND THESIS STUDENTS- 
MBA/MPHIL/PHD 
1. POLICY DETAILS(SUBMISSION)  
• Every student graduating under Bachelor or Masters’ Program 
MBA/MPHIL/PhD must undergo research work where he/she will be writing 
are search report/thesis respectively.  
• Students must successfully complete their research work with in a 
period of maximum one year after completing their courses.  
• Students must successfully defend their thesis in front of a panel to 
qualify for the award of a degree.  
2. POLICY DETAILS (EVALUATION)  
• The panel for judging the thesis will consist of at least two members to be 
selected by the Office of ORIC from the list of potential examiners 
formulated by the Dean.  
• In the case of research report for a Bachelors degree, the students may 
working groups of a maximum of five.  
• In the case of a thesis at the Masters level /M.Phil /PhD, no group work 
will be allowed and each candidate will submit his/her individual thesis.  
• At MBA/MPHIL level the thesis-1/thesis-2 will be graded as ass (P) or 
incomplete (I). In the case of incomplete, the student will be allowed to re
do thesis and submit/re-submit to ORIC.  
• Incaseofthesis-1, the incomplete (I-Grade) will be converted into F-Grade 
if thesis-I is remained unclear/incomplete for more than a year after the 
Thesis-I enrollment.  
• An examination fee of Rs.3000/- will be charged from all masters /M Phil 
/PhD students, whose thesis is to be examined. This will be applicable both 
to the existing students and the new intake.  
2. ADVISOR POLICY  
• Students are allowed to choose their thesis supervisor from the available list 
of supervisors approved by ORIC. The willingness of the supervisor is 
required. In case of non-availability of the mentioned supervisors Head 
Research-ORIC may approve an external supervisor as per the approval 
policy of Iqra University.  
35 
• The supervisor will guide the student in his/her research work as per the 
policy.  
3. THE PROCESS  
 Student must first decide about the possible area of his/her research i.e. 
Telecom, Marketing, Databases, Economics, Finance, Management, 
International Business in Thesis-I supervision class. 

• ORIC will then confirm and approve there search title for the thesis.  
• After this, the student can start working on his/her proposal for research 
under the guidance of the supervisor in Thesis-I class.  
• This proposal will then be submitted to ORIC for evaluation. They should not 
take more than one week to evaluate.  
• After the approval of the ORIC, the student will then continue to work on 
his/her actual Thesis. (i.e. Thesis-II).  
• Once the Thesis is complete then student should submit required copies of 
Thesis to the ORIC and ORIC will appoint the panel of members for 
evaluation.  
• Lastly, student will be asked to defend his/her thesis after the panel has 
received his/her work. This defense will be done within a week after the 
submission of thesis.  
• ORIC will issue a detailed comment sheet on the Evaluation of 
Thesis/Thesis Examination one week after the viva examination.  
• The Certificate of Resubmission duly signed by Thesis supervisor shall 
translate that supervisor has made student to incorporate all required 
modification as suggested by examiners/ORIC via comment sheet.  
• Once the Thesis Certificate of Resubmission will be signed by the supervisor, 
the ORIC will accept the resubmission certificate and the attached thesis draft 
for the Pass Notification of results.  
Remuneration Plan for Thesis Supervision for students of M. Phil / MS / 
new MBA or equivalent:- 
A teacher who supervises the thesis of a student in 
Rs. 5,000/- per 
M. Phil / MS / new MBA or equivalent levels thesis on the successful award of 
the degree. 
36 
  
Sample Thesis/Project Report Format  
(May vary from program to program. The relevant department may be contacted for the 
standard format): 
 
IQRA University 
 
THESIS (RESEARCH REPORT) FORMAT:  
All students must adhere to this thesis (research report) format. 
 
Title Page Required  
Copyright Notice If Used  
Table of Contents Required  
List of Tables Required*  
List of Figures Required*  
Preface, Foreword, Acknowledgments  
Abstract Required  
Introduction** Required  
Literature Review** Required  
Theory  
Theoretical framework and research hypothesis Required  
Research Methodology Required  
Results Required  
Discussion*** Required  
Conclusions*** Required  
Summary  
Literature Cited or References Required  
Appendix If necessary  
Index If necessary 
           
 
37  
Brief Description of Thesis Format 
Steps in Thesis-I
1- Getting registered in Thesis-I Class according to student’s specialization. 2- 
Topic selection in liaison with Thesis-I main and co-supervisor. 
3- Replication check by ORIC on the Thesis-I topics selected, as provided by 
each Thesis-I main supervisor. 
4- Preparing Research Proposal of the finalized topic selected in liaison with 
Thesis-I main and co-supervisor. 
5- Finalization of Research Proposal by getting it duly signed by your Thesis-I 
main supervisor within a semester’s time-period. 
6- Submission of duly signed Research Proposal by your Thesis-I supervisor and 
Thesis-II supervisor selection form to Associate Office of ORIC on the dates 
announced by ORIC. 
7- Thesis-I Results announcement based on the proper submission of Research 
Proposal and the Thesis-II supervisor selection from the ORIC Notice Board 
and Online Examination Result via Iqra University’s website. 
8- New Thesis-II List based on the results of Thesis-I announced on the ORIC 
Notice Board. 
9- In case of Pass, getting registered in Thesis-II and incase of 
Incomplete/Withdraw/Fail contacting ORIC. 
38 
Steps in Thesis-II
1- 
2- 
3- 
4- 
5- 
Getting Registered in Thesis-II on the basis of Passing Thesis-I. 
Announcement of Thesis-II students with respective supervisors as approved 
by ORIC placed on the notice board. 
Attending  Thesis-II  feedback  class  every  week  for  feedback  on  thesis-II 
work. 
Keeping  a  constant  liaison  with  the  respective  thesis-II  supervisor  and 
maintaining minute sheet of every week and submitting it in the Thesis-II 
feedback class. 
After completion of thesis-II, submission to the Associate Office of ORIC 
with all the formalities as  listed on the ORIC notice board. 
6- A week after submission, the examination will be fixed with the panel of two 
thesis examiners approved by ORIC. 
7- The Student at the Examination time has to defend his/her thesis in 
presentation format. 
8- The Examiners provide the status of the evaluation of the given thesis within 
two days. 
9- ORIC prepares the final comment sheet within a week’s time after receiving the 
evaluation sheets from the thesis examiners. 
10- As the comment sheets are ready, ORIC informs the students via Call and/or 
SMS. 
11- The student after receiving the comment sheet requires making modifications 
in the thesis with the assistance of their thesis-II supervisor. In case of Re
Viva, which is mentioned in the comment sheet the student to revisit his/her 
Thesis as per the examiner(s) advice in15 days time and re-appear in Re
Viva Exam as scheduled by ORIC. 
12- The  stu de nt i s  to submit  the  required  modifications i.e.  the Re- 
submission (Final Submission) of the thesis to the Associate Office of ORIC 
after a week’s time with the all formalities as mentioned on the ORIC Notice 
Board.     
13- At  the  point of  Thesis Re-submission  (Final  Submission) with  all the 
39 
formalities, the student thesis is accepted at ORIC for Thesis Pass 
Notification (on the approval of his/her Thesis-II supervisor) and then the 
student has to submit a final copy of complete Approved Thesis in a CD 
format and is required to extract Research Paper out of the Thesis, which 
be duly signed by the student’s thesis-II supervisor as it should be 
submitted in a hard-copy format as well. The research paper should also be 
present in the final CD format. 
14- Once the student has submitted the final Thesis CD and Research Paper in 
both formats (hard and soft copy) then he/she is eligible for collecting the 
certificate of Pass Thesis from Head Office of ORIC and getting the 
certificate bind in the final three Thesis bind copies as guided by the Office 
of ORIC. 
15- After submitting the Thesis Bind copies to the Office of ORIC, the student is 
given the Original Thesis Certificate and the student’s Final Pass 
Notification with all formalities is sent to the Examination department for 
updating the result and then the student is eligible for the Issuance of the 
Final Transcript and respective Degree. 
40 
  
Proposed Guidelines for writing MPhil/PhD Thesis 
 
There is no hard and fast rule in terms of the structure for a thesis. However, Iqra 
University would prefer the thesis/dissertation writing to follow the APA style for the 
purposes of referencing and footnoting the manuscript as well as the bibliography. 
 
Appendices are enclosed which briefly define the approximate content and time 
requirements for completion to set a guideline for candidates to plan their 
approach. Brief description of writing a research proposal is also enclosed as a 
guideline. 
 
The following sections lay down broad guidelines for the formatting that will be 
considered to be the necessary requirements for submission of the 
dissertation/thesis. This format will provide a standard to facilitate printing and 
subsequent use in the library. 
 
Guidelines for writing an average time MPhil / MS / MBA Thesis 
 
Chapter     
or section Topic % Words Months 
1 Introduction 5 1,500 1 
2 Literature review 30 10,000 2 
3 Methodology 20 6,500 1.25 
4 Data analysis 25 8,500 1.5 
5 Conclusions/limitations    
 and    
 Implications 20 6,500 1.25 
  100 33,000 7 
 
Guidelines for writing an average time Ph. D. Thesis 
 
Chapter     
or section Topic % Words Months 
1 Introduction 5 3,500 3 
2 Literature review 30 21,000 6 
3 Methodology 20 14,000 4 
4 Data analysis 25 17,500 5 
5 Conclusions/limitations    
 and    
 Implications 20 17,000 6 
  100 73,000 24  
41  
Guidelines for Supervisors and Examiners of M. Phil/PhD 
Thesis
a) Evidence of an Original Investigation or the Testing of Ideas 
i. 
ii. 
iii. 
iv. 
Was the aim of the research clearly described?  
Were the hypotheses to be tested, questions to be answered, and 
methods to be developed clearly stated?  
Was the relationship between the current and previous research in 
related topic areas defined, with similarities and differences stressed?  
Is the nature and extent of the original contribution clear?  
b) Ability to Make Critical Use of Published Work and Source Materials 
i. 
ii. 
iii. 
iv. 
v. 
Was the literature referenced pertinent to the research?  
To what extent could general reference to the literature be criticized on 
the grounds of insufficiency or excessiveness?  
Was evidence presented of skills in searching the literature?  
Was due credit given to previous workers for ideas and techniques 
used by the author?  
Is evidence displayed of the ability to identify key items in the literature 
and to compare, contrast and critically review them?  
c) Appreciation of the Relationship of the Special Theme to the Wider Field of 
Knowledge 
i. 
ii. 
iii. 
Was the relationship between the current and previous research in 
related topic areas defined, with similarities and differences stressed?  
Was literature in related disciplines reviewed?  
Was an attempt made to present previous work within an overall 
conceptual framework and in a systematic way?  
d) Originality as Shown by the Topic Researched or the Methodology 
Employed 
i. 
To what extent was the topic selected novel?  
42 
ii. 
Was there evidence of innovation in research methodology compared 
with previous practice in the field?  
e) Competence in Independent Work or Organization 
i. 
ii. 
iii. 
iv. 
v. 
vi. 
vii. 
viii. 
ix. 
Was the methodology employed appropriate?  
Was the methodology selected justified?  
Was the methodology applied adequately described?  
Were the variables that might influence the study recognized and 
either controlled in the research design or properly measured?  
Were valid and reliable instruments used to collect the data?  
Was there evidence of care and accuracy in recording and 
summarizing the data?  
Was evidence displayed of knowledge of and the ability to use all 
relevant sources?  
Were limitations inherent in the study recognized and stated?  
Were the conclusions reached justifiable in the light of the data and the 
way they were analyzed?  
f) An Understanding of Appropriate Techniques 
i. 
ii. 
iii. 
iv. 
Given the facilities available, did it seem that the best possible 
techniques were employed to gather and analyze data?  
Was full justification given for the use of the techniques selected?  
Were the selected techniques adequately described?  
Were the techniques selected related to the stated aims of the 
research?  
g) Distinct Contribution to Knowledge 
i. 
ii. 
iii. 
iv. 
v. 
vi. 
What new material was reported?  
To what extent would the new material be perceived as a valuable 
addition to a field of knowledge?  
To what extent do the conclusions overturn or challenge previous 
beliefs?  
Were the findings compared with the findings of any similar studies?  
Was the new contribution clearly delimited and prospects for further 
work identified?  
To what extent does the work open up whole new areas for future 
research?  
43 
 
 
h) Implications for Academics, Entrepreneurs, Policy-Makers and 
Practitioners  
 
i. Has the study made a contribution to theory?   
ii. Has the study identified novel research questions / hypotheses / 
propositions worthy of additional research attention?   
iii. How can this study be extended / replicated in another industrial, 
location or cultural setting?   
iv. How can potential and current entrepreneurs benefit from this study?  
v. What are the managerial implications associated with the study?   
vi. What methods of ‘best practice’ highlighted by entrepreneurs / firms / 
enterprise agencies has the study identified?   
vii. What policy debates has the study addressed? Has the study identified 
a new policy angle that needs to be considered?   
viii. How can policy-makers and practitioners disseminate the identified 
methods of best practice?  
 
I) Worthy, in part, of Publication 
 
i. Was the organization of the report logical?  
ii. Was the style of the report attractive?   
iii. With appropriate extraction and editing could the basis of articles or a 
book be identified?  
  
 
J) Advice for Students  
 
i. Read widely   
ii. Focus ideas   
iii. Revisit or attend research methodology course   
iv. Must take full responsibility for the thesis as an independent project   
v. Discuss ideas with other students   
vi. Regularly contact supervisor  
               
 
44  
Rules for Independent Study Course
i. 
ii. 
iii. 
iv. 
v. 
vi. 
vii. 
viii. 
Independent Study Course will be normally offered only for Ph. D. programmes 
with enrolments of 5 or less students in a course. In special cases in Masters 
Programmes permission may be given by the President on the 
recommendations of the Dean.  
Independent Study will be offered only for those courses which are approved by 
the statutory bodies.  
Independent Study will be offered only for courses where registration is less 
than 05 students.  
For an Independent Study Course, a minimum of 04 meetings are required 
between student and supervisor.  
A mid-term of not less than 20% and final exam of not less than 30% weight 
age must be conducted.  
Course evaluation must include term report of not less than 30% of total marks.  
A record must be submitted to the Examination Department of each meeting 
with the student on a regular attendance sheet and course control form 
(specimen attached). Another copy must be submitted to the HOD for record 
keeping.  
The course must be completed within semester duration.  
Code of Academic Integrity
Integrity is expected of every student in all academic work. The guiding principle of 
academic integrity is that a student’s submitted work must be the student’s own. 
Students engaging in academic dishonesty diminish their education and bring 
discredit to the academic community. Students shall not violate the Code of 
Academic Integrity and shall avoid situations likely to compromise academic 
integrity. 
Conduct prohibited by the Code consists of all forms of academic dishonesty, 
including, but not limited to: cheating, fabrication, facilitating academic dishonesty, 
and plagiarism (using someone else’s work without writing proper reference) as set 
out and defined in the Code of conduct, modifying academic work for the purpose of 
obtaining additional credit after such work has been submitted to the supervising 
faculty member unless the supervising faculty member approves such alterations; 
and attempting to commit any act prohibited by the Code. Any attempt to commit an 
45 
act prohibited by these rules shall be subject to sanctions to the same extent as 
completed acts. All cases concerning prohibited conduct will be forwarded to the 
disciplinary committee. 
HANDLING OF COMPLAINTS REGARDING PLAGIARISM 
AGAINST TEACHERS OR STUDENTS IN THE UNIVERSITY
The policy of Iqra University is that it will not tolerate any plagiarism by teachers or 
students. 
At the same time, IU is cognizant of the fact that this is a serious complaint. 
Therefore, IU want its teachers and students not to be harassed by frivolous and 
false complaints. 
In the light of the above scenario, the University has laid down basic rules for 
handling such complaints:- 
i. 
ii. 
iii. 
iv. 
v. 
No verbal complaints will be entertained. The complainants must be asked to 
fully identify themselves and to put their complaints in writing with their 
signatures / authentication.  
There will be some anonymous and pseudonymous complaints. All such 
complaints must be ignored as IU cannot go on a witch-hunt where the 
complainant fails to properly take the responsibility for leveling the allegations.  
Complaints of plagiarism must be supported by documentary evidence.  
Complaints of this nature are a University level issue. All such complaints along 
with the documentation must be forwarded immediately to the Registrar. This is 
necessary as such complaints defame the name of the University.  
Where well documented complaints are received from individuals or the Higher 
Education Commission or any other regulatory body, the University will take 
cognizance and proceed in the light of the procedures laid down by the Higher 
Education Commission.  
46 
University Academic Honors and Scholarships
Honors are bestowed as recognition of outstanding academic achievement and as a 
means to further encourage sound scholarship. They are awarded to every 
undergraduate student attaining the required proficiency. Students also receive 
plaques and certificates. The Iqra University supports academic achievement and is 
pleased to recognize and reward undergraduate students whose performance merits 
special attention. 
a. Dean’s List: 
Three categories are awarded every semester based on units completed for 
credit and letter grade excluding Research Project(s) and Theses. 
i. 
ii. 
iii. 
3.74.  
iv. 
Dean’s List with Distinction is based on 15 credits - minimum five courses and a  
4.0 grade-point average.  
Dean’s List is based on 15 credits and a grade-point average of 3.75-3.99.  
Honorable Mention is based on 15 credits and a grade-point average of 3.50 -  
A student can be placed on the Dean’s list provided he/she secures a semester  
GPA of 3.75 or above with a minimum of fifteen credits load. A student on the  
Dean’s List is entitled to a scholarship, if his CGPA is above 3.5.  
Students awarded these academic honors receive a certificate at the University 
gathering. This recognition becomes part of their official record.  
b. Performance Based Scholarships:  
i. 
ii. 
iii. 
iv. 
Students achieving 4 GPA will be offered a scholarship of 60% of the fee for 
that semester.  
Students acquiring 3.75 GPA to 3.99 GPA will be offered a scholarship of 40% 
of the fee for that semester provided they have a CGPA of 3.5.  
Students achieving GPA 3.5 to 3.74 will be offered a scholarship of 20% of the 
fee for that semester provided they have a CGPA of 3.5.  
The above scholarships will be admissible to students against whom there is no 
disciplinary proceeding pending and they have taken at least the following 
credit hours:-  
47 
a. For a Bachelor program at least 15 credit hours.  
b. For a Masters program 12 credit hours.  
c. For MS Programs in Media & Engineering 9 credit hours (if offering is not 
more than 9 credit hours).  
Note: Research Project (s) and Theses shall not be included in 
Cr. Hr count.  
v. 
vi. 
vii. 
viii. 
The total number of scholarships will not exceed 10% of the total number of 
students enrolled in that semester in that particular program.  
These scholarships are offered on semester basis only and a list is prepared 
after the announcement of every semester result.  
If the total number of applicants exceeds 10% then a merit list will be prepared.  
A separate list of scholarship recipients will be prepared for each program.  
c. Qarz-e-Hasana / Need Based Financial Assistance: 
Keeping in view the socio-economic conditions in the country, Iqra University 
will provide Qarz-e-Hasana to the poor and needy students to pursue higher 
education. It is also the vision of Iqra University to educate more and more 
Pakistani children so that they may be able to spend their lives in a proper and 
prosperous manner. The Procedure is: 
i. 
ii. 
iii. 
iv. 
v. 
vi. 
vii. 
Applicants who have limited financial resources may apply for Qarz-e-Hasana 
(30% of the total fee per semester. This may go upto 50% in some deserving 
cases). The decision of award would be subject to verification of the 
information provided.  
The applicant(s) will collect the prescribed forms from SIC (Student 
Information Centre) and will submit the completed forms with required 
information and documents to SIC.  
The applicant (s) will mention the period (Number of Semesters) he/she 
would be requiring this assistance.  
The forms will be presented to the Vice Chancellor for approval. It usually 
takes one day subject to availability of the concerned authority.  
After the approval new fee voucher for the reduced amount will be issued to 
the student.  
The entitlement of Qarz-e-Hasana will remain valid if student(s) maintains 
GPA=2.5 or above.  
The University does not charge any kind of interest on the amount of Qarz-e
Hasana given to the student.  
48 
Procedure of Recoup: 
I. 
The Qarz-e-Hasana amount will be returned to the university within 
one year of graduation in equal installments or lump sum as per 
convenience of the student.  
d. Sports Scholarship:  
i. 
ii. 
iii. 
iv. 
v. 
vi. 
vii. 
vii. 
Sports scholarships will be awarded on the recommendations of departmental 
committee including Manager Events & Sports.  
Scholarship will be offered initially for one semester and will be renewed for 
each semester based on student’s participation in the sports event 
representing IU. The recommendation will come from Manager Events & 
Sports.  
A Player who has secured Gold, Silver or Bronze Medal at International Level 
in sports event will be offered 60% scholarship on tuition fee at the time of 
admission at IU.  
A Player who has only participated at International Level or has secured Gold, 
Silver or Bronze Medal at National level in a sports even will be offered 50% 
scholarship on tuition fee at the time of admission at IU.  
A Player who has secured Gold, Silver or Bronze Medal at Regional Level will 
be offered 30% scholarship on tuition fee at the time of admission at IU.  
In order to obtain sports scholarship a player has to:  
a) Clear University admission test.  
b) Clear an interview with departmental committee comprising  
Sports Scholarship will not be awarded again for a course in which the player 
has “F” grade.  
Player will be not allowed to play for any other organization while they are 
availing scholarship at IU.  
The Gold Medal Award Criteria 
Gold Medal Award Criteria is as follows: 
i. 
ii. 
iii. 
Gold medal will be awarded to the students program wise and for the period 
announced. The gold medal(s) will be distributed amongst the students 
registered for the convocation.  
The gold medal will be awarded to the student who secures the highest CGPA 
in particular degree program with no “F” grade during the whole academic 
tenure.  
The gold medal will be awarded to a student having no disciplinary 
punishments.  
49 
iv. 
v. 
vi. 
vii. 
viii. 
ix. 
If the student does not complete the degree within the prescribed time, he/she 
will not be eligible for the award of gold medal.  
The gold medal will not be awarded to transfer students of universities other 
than Iqra University who transferred more than 10% of the total credit hours.  
Inter Campus Transferees will be eligible for a gold medal.  
In case of a tie between two or more students on their CGPA, the total marks 
obtained during the whole academic period covering the mandatory course 
requirements should be considered as the tie-breaking criterion.  
In case the tie persists, two or more gold medals, as the case may be, should 
be awarded.  
A gold medal should be awarded to the student having a minimum 3.5 CGPA.  
Award of the Degree
1. In order to qualify for the award of a Degree in the University, every candidate 
must have: 
i. 
ii. 
iii. 
iv. 
v. 
vi. 
vii. 
Completed all required courses as a student of the University in 
accordance with the regulations.  
A CGPA of at least 2.5.  
Pursued that course of study for the prescribed period and passed the 
required examinations.  
For the issuance of degree it should be applied to the university on the 
prescribed application form and must have collected the receipt of such 
application.  
Paid the prescribed fees and submitted the required forms;  
Complied with such other Ordinances and Regulations as may be 
relevant.  
Discharged all obligations to the University including the payment of fees 
prescribed by regulation, the return of all books and other material 
borrowed from the Library and any other sum due from him/her to the 
University.  
2. Degrees shall be conferred at the Convocation of the University.  
50 
  
 
3. With the approval of the management, Degrees, Diplomas and Certificates 
may be conferred upon persons in absentia. Such approvals must be sought 
from the office of Registrar in writing.  
 
4. The university prescribed fee for the award of degree is Rs. 6000/-. However 
the University reserves the right to increase the fee from time to time.  
 
Rounding of CGPA for the Award of Degree 
 
The GPA should not be rounded off to any nearest figures. If the system 
performs any rounding off in the GPA at any level it should be amended. 
                                              
 
51  
Transcript Issuance (Complete / Incomplete)
a. Incomplete Transcript: 
Students enrolled in a program can apply for an incomplete transcript for their own 
record or any other reason. This transcript will reflect all grades of the students 
whether “withdrawal, Incomplete, Fail” etc. 
b. Complete Transcript: 
A student is eligible to apply for a complete transcript after he / she has completed 
the program of study successfully with a CGPA of 2.5 or above. 
Before the issuance of transcript, the examination department will check the entire 
courses (passed or failed) with original grade card and change the course result if it 
is reflected differently on the system. 
Students can view their incomplete transcripts on the Web Site. 
Procedure for the award of a Duplicate Transcript or Degree
The following procedure will be followed for the award of a duplicate transcript 
or a duplicate degree to a student who loses his/her degree or a transcript:- 
i. 
ii. 
iii. 
He/she has to file an FIR and give the University a copy of the same.  
The student pays fees of Rs. 1000/- for a Duplicate transcript and Rs. 
6,000/- for a duplicate degree. 
(Rates are subject to revision from time to time by Finance and Planning 
Committee) 
The office verifies the academic records and prepares a duplicate 
transcript or a duplicate degree which are marked as “Duplicate”.  
Co-curricular Activities
1. There shall be a Students’ Council of the University for the Promotion of the 
general interests of students and to afford a recognized channel of 
communication between students and the outside business environment.  
2. Members of the academic staff may be appointed/nominated as coordinators 
of different societies of the University.  
3. Appointment of faculty members as coordinators shall be for a period of one 
academic year. A coordinator shall, on the expiry of his/her semester of  
52 
appointment as coordinator, be eligible for re-appointment as coordinator of 
the same society. 
4. Each society under the Council is required to conduct at least one activity in a 
semester. The purpose of activity should be enhancement of general 
knowledge in the student body.  
5. Full details of decisions to conduct an activity must be published by the 
society and the notice made available to all students and to the management 
of the University.  
6. The Hierarchy of the Council is as under:  
i. 
ii. 
iii. 
Council Coordinator (a faculty member)  
President  
Vice President  
iv. General Secretary  
v. Finance Secretary  
vi. 04 Executive Committee Members(In case of societies that come 
under the Council)  
7. Office bearers of the society shall be
:  
All students who have passed at least 06 courses at the university.  
i. 
ii. 
iii. 
Those students who have not completed 06 courses at the time of 
election may be considered subject to their experience and abilities.  
All students must have a cumulative GPA of 2.5 and above.  
Must apply for membership on the prescribed form.  
iv. Must not be involved in any unethical activities (according to the 
University regulations).  
v. Must not have been fined/penalized or punished at the University for 
any Offence in the last two semesters.  
vi. Must be able to spare time for organizing various events and be 
capable of coordinating other members of the society on regular 
basis.  
vii. Any member of a society shall not work for another society at the 
same time.  
viii. Obeying other regulations as may be relevant.  
ix. The coordinator of the societies shall get approval from the 
administration for an activity one month before the scheduled date.  
53 
Entrepreneurship (Incubation Centre) Policy
In order to inculcate entrepreneurial sense among the aspiring graduates IU 
promotes students to take initiatives of practicing business like situations and to 
transform conceited ideas into reality through entrepreneurial incubation centres. 
The following measures should be kept in consideration: 
1- The objective of the policy is to promote entrepreneurial activities. 
2- The aspiring students would apply for incubation centre facility who want to 
transform their ideas into reality 
3- A committee comprising of 
following members would vet and approve the 
request of the student:  
A- The Dean of Business School 
B- The HoD (Under Graduate) / The HoD (Graduate) Program 
C- One Senior Faculty Member 
4- The requests will be assessed on the following aspects: 
i- 
Demand of the proposed business 
ii- 
iii- 
iv- 
v- 
vi- 
vii- 
viii- 
Marketability of the Project 
The extent of the marketing, finance, and human resources needed. 
Existence of such business in the market 
Quality of the overall business plan 
Ability of the proposal to take-up such venture 
Relationship  of  the  proposal  with  mission  and  vision  of  Business 
School  
The business has to be in the service industry and overall cost of the 
startup and the overall cost of the proposed business should not be 
over 100,000.00  
5- The committee would recommend only 03 project per year 
6- Nature and the Support provided by the university: 
i- 
Workstation  
ii- 
Office with telephone & internet (LAN/Wifi) and other requisite facilities 
7- The funds will be borne on IU Students’ Council Fund. 
54 
Activities and Policies relating to Placement & Corporate Liaison
Internship
Out Campus: 
i. 
ii. 
iii. 
iv. 
v. 
vi. 
All Students of IU are required to undertake an internship of 8 to 12 weeks in 
an organization of good repute.  
Internship is a mandatory requirement for award of Bachelors and Master 
degrees. The students of Bachelors program shall have completed 24 courses 
and Master students shall have completed 10 courses in order to be eligible for 
internship.  
To get internship opportunity, the student should have at least 2.5 CGPA.  
The student can also submit an application to the placement department to get 
assistance in getting Internship. However, it will remain the prime responsibility 
of the student (s) to seek an opportunity of internship.  
The student shall have to pass the in-house interview for internship, if 
Placement Department is arranging the same.  
At the end of the internship period, the student shall submit an internship report 
and is also subject to an interview. The student will also obtain a performance 
report (on IU Prescribed Form) from the supervisor of the relevant organization.  
In Campus: 
a. Conditions: 
i. 
ii. 
iii. 
iv. 
v. 
The student should have a CGPA of 2.50 or above  
Internees are required to work for a minimum of 30 hours per week.  
The Internee Shall be appointed for a specific purpose. However, he/she may 
be called for any other work during the semester for which he/she will keep 
himself/herself available.  
The internee will not perform any activities which may be detrimental to the 
reputation of the University.  
Hiring of internees will be for a period of 3 months which will be extendable for 
another 3 month subject to the approval of the competent authority.  
55 
vi. 
vii. 
Internees will be paid as under:  
a. For Bachelor / Master students Rs. 3,000 per month ( Fixed )  
b. For MS students Rs.4000 per month ( Fixed )  
(This amount may be reviewed from time to time by Finance and Planning 
Committee of the University) 
Internees will not be entitled to fringe benefits offered to other employees of the 
University  
b. Process:  
i. 
ii. 
iii. 
The Head of the respective Department will evaluate tasks to be performed by 
these internees and fill out “Internee Request Form” and will submit the same to  
Human Resource Department (HRD).  
Approval will be granted by the president and the Registrar for all Internees to 
be hired for all departments. In case of campuses other than the Main Campus 
the approval will be granted by the Director of the Campus.  
After the approval is granted, the HRD will issue standardized appointment 
letters to the applicants. Signed copy of letter will be returned to the HR by the 
Registrar’s Office/candidate who will forward it to the Finance Department for 
record keeping purposes.  
56 
Alumni Association:
The Iqra University Alumni Association was formed in 2001 as a network for 
encouraging promotion of alumni related activities. This forum enabled graduates to 
initiate their support and activities related to Student welfare, Academics and 
Research. These activities have been extended to focus on alumni relations and 
their efforts in support of the University. Alumni interest and goodwill has been 
encouraged resulting in development of intellectual and emotional ties between 
members and their University. 
The Association office bearers are elected through electronic/ digital voting. 
The Executive Committee comprise of: 
1. Patron  
2. President  
3. Secretary General  
4. Joint/Working Secretary General (Ex-Officio HOD Alumni Affairs)  
5. Vice President Memberships  
6. Vice President Loyalty Cards  
7. Vice President Local Chapters  
8. Vice President Academics  
9. Treasurer  
Tenure: All the elected office bearers shall hold office for 2 years. The Executive 
body shall have all the powers for the management and promotion of the objectives 
of the Association. No person shall serve more than two consecutive terms in the 
executive committee. 
Vacancy: In the eventuality of any seat being vacant, Executive Body shall 
nominate 
members 
Meetings: 
to 
fill 
the 
vacancy 
by 
the 
Patrons 
approval. 
Executive Body shall meet every two months (Physically/Electronically), however, 
secretary may call an urgent meeting any time with the consent of the President. 07 
days’ notice shall be given to the members for Executive Body for convening a 
meeting. 
Events: 
Alumni dinner & meet ups are arranged at university by Alumni Association in 
coordination with Office of Alumni Affairs. Alumni Association is also responsible for 
the hosting Seminars / Intellect Exchange Events & Annual Meeting. 
57 
Funds: The funds available at IU Students’ Council can be disbursed for activities of 
Alumni Council. Similarly funds raised by Alumni Council will be deposited in the 
Student Council’s account. 
CONVOCATION
Rules relating to the convocation of the University:- 
1. These regulations may be called the IQRA University, Karachi convocation 
Regulations, 2001  
2. These regulations shall come into force with immediate effect.  
3. In these regulations the following expression shall have the meanings hereby 
respectively assigned to them, that is to say:-  
i. 
ii. 
iii. 
iv. 
v. 
vi. 
vii. 
viii. 
ix. 
x. 
xi. 
xii. 
‘University’ means the IQRA University Karachi.  
‘Patron’ means the Patron of the University, who shall be Governor of 
the Sindh.  
‘Chancellor’ means the Chancellor of the University.  
‘President’ means President of the University.  
‘Registrar’ means Registrar of the University.  
‘Controller  of  Examination’  means  Controller  of  Examination  of  the  
University.  
‘Dean’ means Dean of Faculty of the University.  
‘Board of Governors’ means Board of Governors of the University.  
‘Degree’ means the degrees of the University.  
‘Convocation’ means the convocation of the University.  
‘Candidates” mean the persons who are to be formally admitted to  
the degrees at the Convocation.  
4. Formal admission of such persons who have passed the examinations required 
for the various degrees of the University and fulfill the conditions prescribed for 
admissions to these degrees shall ordinarily take the form of conferment of 
degrees on the candidates concerned at convocation.  
5. The convocation shall be held in the Campus of Iqra University.  
Planning and Documentation of Research Activities
1. University encourages dissemination of published work and hence faculty 
members must share their research work in departmental meetings, seminars 
and courses so that learning can be shared.  
2. The role of the ORIC of the university will remain intact in all research 
activities.  
58 
3. The teaching departments must encourage their faculty to commercialize their 
research work by patenting it. ORIC department will be responsible to provide 
such support.  
Research and Development Policy
Educational institutions at tertiary level exists to create new knowledge. Hence 
research & development is a prime concern of the university and the following 
policies must be complied with: 
1. Every student & faculty member of the university must be encouraged to 
undertake research.  
2. All students must undertake at least 06 credit hours of research courses as 
part of their curricula.  
3. The student researches must be carried out as per their Research Project 
guidelines.  
4. 
All research work must be checked for plagiarism as per the Plagiarism policy 
of the university.  
